Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0685.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 36109b. The owner of farmland and related buildings subject to a conservation easement described in section 2141 and to a development rights agreement under section 36104, a purchase of development rights or agricultural conservation easement under section 36111b, or an agricultural conservation easement under section 36206 may claim a credit under section 36109 if the conservation easement described in section 2141 and the development rights agreement, purchase of development rights, or agricultural conservation easement were executed before January 1, 2025. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 686. (b) Senate Bill No. 687. (c) Senate Bill No. 688. (d) Senate Bill No. 689. (e) Senate Bill No. 690. (f) Senate Bill No. 699. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor